Tennessee, session 114, SB2334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 12, Chapter 3, Part 12, is amended by
adding the following language as a new section:
(a) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, a local government having
revenues of at least twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) in the most recent prior fiscal
year may use any project delivery method that the local government determines most
effectively meet the needs of the local government for the construction of qualified local
projects; provided, that:
(1) The party retained to provide the project delivery method is selected
by means of a competitive proposal process; and
(2) The local government's applicable ordinances, rules, regulations, or
policies authorize such competitive proposal process.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) "Construction manager at-risk" means a project delivery method
where the construction manager, acting as the local government entity's general
contractor, is contracted to advise the designer and builder, and to deliver a
project within a guaranteed maximum price;
(2) "Design-bid-build" means the traditional project delivery method,
which customarily involves three (3) sequential project phases, being design,
SB2334
012680
- 1 -

procurement, and construction, and two (2) distinct contracts for the design and
construction phases;
(3) "Design-build" means a construction project delivery method that
combines architectural and engineering design services with construction
performance under one (1) contract;
(4) "Local government" means a county, municipality, metropolitan
government, town, utility district, utility authority, local education agency, or other
local governmental entity;
(5) "Project delivery method" means any of the following construction
contracting methods:
(A) Construction manager at-risk;
(B) Design-bid-build; or
(C) Design-build; and
(6) "Qualified local project" means any construction project, including the
renovation of or expansion of an existing building, with an estimated cost to the
local government in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012680